Washington statutes.
RCW 39.46.040

Bonds—Issuer to determine amount, terms, conditions, interest, etc.—Designated representative.

(1) A local government authorized to issue bonds must determine for the bond issue its amount, date or dates, terms not in excess of the maximum term otherwise provided in law, conditions, bond denominations, interest rate or rates, which may be fixed or variable, interest payment dates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration privileges, manner of execution, price, manner of sale, covenants, and form, including registration as to principal and interest, registration as to principal only, or bearer. Registration may be as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2) If an ordinance or resolution approving the issuance of bonds authorizes an officer or employee of the local government to serve as its designated representative and to accept, on behalf of the local government, an offer to purchase those bonds, the acceptance of the offer by the designated representative must be consistent with terms established by the ordinance or resolution, and with additional parameters set by the governing body of the local government in the ordinance or resolution. That ordinance or resolution must establish the following terms for the bonds or set forth parameters with respect thereto: The amount, date or dates, denominations, interest rate or rates (or mechanism for determining interest rate or rates), payment dates, final maturity, redemption rights, price, minimum savings for refunding bonds (if the refunding bonds are issued for savings purposes), and any other terms and conditions deemed appropriate by the legislative body of the local government. A county designating a representative in accordance with this subsection must act in a manner that is consistent with the approved county debt policy adopted in accordance with RCW 36.48.070.

[ 2011 c 210 s 1; 1983 c 167 s 4.]

NOTES:

Application to previously issued bonds—2011 c 210: "All bonds previously issued and any reimbursements previously made with bond proceeds by any local government and consistent with the provisions of this act are hereby validated, ratified, and confirmed." [ 2011 c 210 s 6.]

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.